Delaware, session 153, HB21.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Â§ 4714, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4714. Schedule I. (h) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of tianeptine including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible.